Missouri, session 2026, SB1665.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 542, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 542.273, to read as
follows:
542.273. 1. No government agent shall enter a private
home or residence without a warrant except:
(1) After receiving the permission of the property
owner, lessee, or occupant;
(2) To respond to a life-threatening emergency or
another immediate threat to public safety that was either
reported to the government agent or the government agent
personally observed;
(3) To prevent the imminent destruction of evidence of
a crime where the government agent has probable cause such
destruction is about to occur.
Upon entering private land, the government agent shall
immediately notify the landowner, lessee, or occupant if
notice can be reasonably made. Unless entering under an
exception in this subsection, a government agent shall show
the warrant to the property owner, lessee, or occupant if
they are present. If a government agent is equipped with a

SB 1665 2
body-mounted camera while entering a home or private land,
the camera shall be activated and recording the entire time
the government agent is on the property. A government agent
shall not seize any private property from a home or private
land unless the government agent first acquires a warrant
authorizing the seizure, or the government agent has entered
the home or private land with consent or under exigent
circumstances and has individualized probable cause of the
commission of a criminal offense.
2. Any evidence obtained pursuant to a search or
seizure conducted in violation of this section is
inadmissible in any administrative, civil, or criminal
proceeding. Any arrest made pursuant to a search or seizure
conducted in violation of this section is invalid. Any
person who has been subjected to a search or seizure in
violation of this section may bring a civil action against
the state agency employing such government agent. A
prevailing plaintiff may recover declaratory relief,
injunctive relief, compensatory damages, nominal damages,
and attorney's fees.
3. As used in this section, the term "government
agent" shall mean any employee of a state agency, as the
term "state agency" is defined in section 36.020.
✓